Utah statutes.
17B-1-614.   Adoption of final budget -- Certification and filing.

(1)  The board of trustees of each local district shall by resolution adopt a budget for the ensuing fiscal year for each fund for which a budget is required under this part prior to the beginning of the fiscal year, except as provided in Sections 59-2-919 through 59-2-923. 

(2)  The local district's budget officer shall certify a copy of the final budget for each fund and file it with the state auditor within 30 days after adoption.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

